South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-116-10 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-116-10. As used in this chapter: (1) "Campus" means the grounds and buildings owned and occupied by a college or university or of a Governor's School for education purposes and streets and roads through and contiguous to the grounds. (2) "College or university" means a state chartered two or four-year private educational institution of higher learning located in this State. (3) "Campus police officer" means an employee of a college or university whose duties include the enforcement of the laws of this State; the preservation of public order; the protection of life and property; the prevention, detection, or investigation of crime; or a combination of those duties.  It does not include personnel of a private company which provides security services on a contract basis for the institution concerned. (4) "Governor's School" means the Special School of Science and Mathematics established in Chapter 48, the Governor's School for Agriculture at John de la Howe established in Chapter 49, and the Governor's School for the Arts and Humanities established in Chapter 50. SECTION 2.  Section 59-116-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-116-20. (A) The board of trusteesgoverning board of each college or university and each Govenor's School may establish a safety and security department and appoint and employ campus police officers to carry out the functions of the department. While on duty, campus police officers shall wear distinctive uniforms prescribed by the board of trustees or its designees. (B) The officers must be commissioned as constables pursuant to Section 23-1-60 and take the oath of office prescribed by law and the state Constitution for those officers. The jurisdiction of such a constable is limited to the campus grounds and streets and roads through and contiguous to them. SECTION 3.  Section 59-116-30(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) Safety and security departments created and operated by the governing boards of trustees of institutions under this chapter for the purposes of this chapter are campus police departments and the sworn campus police officers of the department are campus police officers. SECTION 4.  Section 59-116-80(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) It is unlawful for a person to falsely represent himself to be a campus police officer, agent, or employee of a safety and security department of a college or universityan institution under this chapter, or arrest, detain, search, or question in any manner the person or property of a person, nor may a person without the authority of the governing board of the institution wear its official uniform, insignia, badge, or identification of the department. SECTION 5.  Section 59-116-120 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-116-120.  The provisions of this chapter may not be construed to prevent colleges and universitiesinstitutions under this chapter from employing or continuing to employ guards, gatekeepers, and other security personnel, and the chapter applies only to those security officers who are granted the additional law enforcement authority including the power to arrest provided for officers who fulfill the requirements and meet the standards prescribed in this chapter. SECTION 6.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----